Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF504.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 7 TLSB 2314YH (3) 91 jda/jh H.F. 504 Section 1. Section 256.111, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 5A. a. The collaborative initiative shall 3 develop and administer a robotics grant program to provide 4 grants to school districts, accredited nonpublic schools, 5 charter schools, and innovation zone schools to support 6 robotics programs by offsetting costs associated with all of 7 the following: 8 (1) The payment of stipends to members of school robotics 9 teams. 10 (2) Fees, kits, and supplies that are required to establish 11 or maintain a school robotics team or to participate in a 12 robotics competition. 13 (3) Event registration, materials, transportation costs, 14 travel costs, and other expenses related to attending a 15 robotics competition. 16 b. The collaborative initiative shall establish the 17 application processes, deadlines, eligibility requirements, and 18 award criteria associated with the robotics grant program. 19 c. Moneys awarded under this subsection shall be used to 20 supplement, not supplant, existing public funding used by a 21 school district for similar purposes. 22 Sec. 2. DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION ââ ROBOTICS GRANT 23 PROGRAM. There is appropriated from the general fund of the 24 state to the department of education for the fiscal year 25 beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following 26 amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the 27 purposes designated: 28 For purposes of the robotics grant program established 29 pursuant to section 256.111, subsection 5A, if enacted: 30 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 400,000 31 Sec. 3. UNIVERSITY OF NORTHERN IOWA ââ ROBOTICS 32 COMPETITION. There is appropriated from the general fund of 33 the state to the state board of regents for the fiscal year 34 beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following 35 -1- LSB 2314YH (3) 91 jda/jh 1/ 2 H.F. 504 amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the 1 purposes designated: 2 For the university of northern Iowa for purposes of 3 developing a public-private partnership with a person or 4 persons who provide matching funds to support the Iowa regional 5 FIRST robotics competition, including salaries, support, 6 maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes: 7 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 100,000 8